test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-puolli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - puõʹlli e-stem warm/ lämmin: # Adjective - full paradigm
     puõʹlli+A+Sg+Nom: puõʹlli
     puõʹlli+A+Sg+Gen: puõʹlli
     puõʹlli+A+Sg+Acc: puõʹlli
     puõʹlli+A+Sg+Ill: [puõʹllʼja, puõʹlˈlǥa]
     puõʹlli+A+Sg+Loc: puõʹlˈlʼjest
     puõʹlli+A+Sg+Com: puõʹlˈlʼjin
     puõʹlli+A+Ess: puõʹlˈlʼjen
     puõʹlli+A+Par: puõʹlˈlʼjed
     puõʹlli+A+Sg+Abe: puõʹllitää
     puõʹlli+A+Pl+Nom: puõʹlli
     puõʹlli+A+Pl+Gen: puõʹllʼji
     puõʹlli+A+Pl+Acc: puõʹllʼjid
     puõʹlli+A+Pl+Ill: puõʹllʼjid
     puõʹlli+A+Pl+Loc: puõʹlˈlʼjin
     puõʹlli+A+Pl+Com: puõʹllʼjivuiʹm
     puõʹlli+A+Pl+Abe: puõʹllʼjitää
